Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.200

Separately managed accounts—Employment of personnel.

The state treasurer's office is authorized to employ such personnel as are necessary to administer the separately managed accounts. The bond of the state treasurer as required by law shall be made to include the faithful performance of all functions relating to the separately managed accounts.

[ 2019 c 163 s 8.]